Hawaii statutes.
§604-7.4 Cure or waiver of defects.
(a) The district court of a circuit in which is commenced a civil case laying
venue in the wrong circuit shall transfer the case, upon or without terms and
conditions as the court deems proper, to the district court of any circuit in
which it could have been brought, or if it is in the interest of justice
dismiss the case.

(b) Nothing in sections 604-7 to 604-7.4 shall
impair the jurisdiction of a district court of any matter involving a party who
does not interpose timely and sufficient objection to the venue. [L 1971, c
144, §5]

Rules of Court

Objections to venue, how presented, see DCRCP rule 12(b),
(h); transfer, see DCRCP rule 3(d).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next